North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-27 State Aid
15.1-27-04.1.
Baseline funding — Establishment — Determination of state aid. [Effective July 1, 2025]

To determine the amount of state aid payable to each district, the superintendent of public instruction shall establish each district's baseline funding. A district's baseline funding consists of:

All state aid received by the district in accordance with chapter 15.1-27 during the 2018-19 school year;

An amount equal to the property tax deducted by the superintendent of public instruction to determine the 2018-19 state aid payment;

An amount equal to seventy-five percent of the revenue received by the school district during the 2017-18 school year for the following revenue types:

Revenue reported under code 2000 of the North Dakota school district financial accounting and reporting manual, as developed by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with section 15.1-02-08;

Mineral revenue received by the school district through direct allocation from the state treasurer and not reported under code 2000 of the North Dakota school district financial accounting and reporting manual, as developed by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with section 15.1-02-08;

Tuition reported under code 1300 of the North Dakota school district financial accounting and reporting manual, as developed by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with section 15.1-02-08, with the exception of revenue received specifically for the operation of an educational program provided at a residential treatment facility, tuition received for the provision of an adult farm management program, and beginning in the 2025-26 school year, eighty-five percent of tuition received under an agreement to educate students from a school district on an air force base with funding received through federal impact aid, until the 2026-27 school year, and each school year thereafter, when all tuition received under an agreement to educate students from a school district on an air force base with funding received through federal impact aid must be excluded from the tuition calculation under this paragraph;

Revenue from payments in lieu of taxes on the distribution and transmission of electric power;

Revenue from payments in lieu of taxes on electricity generated from sources other than coal; and

Revenue from the leasing of land acquired by the United States for which compensation is allocated to the state under 33 U.S.C. 701(c)(3); and

An amount equal to the total revenue received by the school district during the 2017-18 school year for the following revenue types:

Mobile home tax revenue;

Telecommunications tax revenue; and

Revenue from payments in lieu of taxes and state reimbursement of the homestead credit and disabled veterans credit.

Beginning with the 2020-21 school year, the superintendent shall reduce the baseline funding for any school district that becomes an elementary district pursuant to section 15.1-07-27 after the 2012-13 school year. The reduction must be proportional to the number of weighted student units in the grades that are offered through another school district relative to the total number of weighted student units the school district offered in the year before the school district became an elementary district. The reduced baseline funding applies to the calculation of state aid for the first school year in which the school district becomes an elementary district and for each year thereafter. For districts that become an elementary district prior to the 2020-21 school year, the superintendent shall use the reduced baseline funding to calculate state aid for the 2020-21 school year and for each year thereafter

The superintendent shall divide the district's baseline funding determined in subsection 1 by the district's 2017-18 weighted student units to determine the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit.

For any school district that becomes an elementary district pursuant to section 15.1-07-27 after the 2017-18 school year, the superintendent shall adjust the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit used to calculate state aid. The superintendent shall divide the district's baseline funding determined in subsection 1 by the district's weighted student units after the school district becomes an elementary district to determine the district's adjusted baseline funding per weighted student unit. The superintendent shall use the district's adjusted baseline funding per weighted student unit in the calculation of state aid for the first school year in which the school district becomes an elementary district and for each year thereafter

Beginning with the 2021-22 school year and for each school year thereafter, the superintendent shall reduce the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit. Each year the superintendent shall calculate the amount by which the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit exceeds the payment per weighted student unit provided in subsection 3. The superintendent shall reduce the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit by fifteen percent of the amount by which the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit exceeds the payment per weighted student unit for the 2021-22 school year. For each year thereafter, the reduction percentage is increased by an additional fifteen percent. However, the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit, after the reduction, may not be less than the payment per weighted student unit provided in subsection 3.

For the 2021-22 school year, the superintendent shall calculate state aid as the greater of:

The district's weighted student units multiplied by ten thousand one hundred thirty-six dollars;

One hundred two percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, multiplied by the district's weighted student units, not to exceed the district's 2017-18 baseline weighted student units, plus any weighted student units in excess of the 2017-18 baseline weighted student units multiplied by ten thousand one hundred thirty-six dollars; or

The district's baseline funding as established in subsection 1 less the amount in paragraph 1, with the difference reduced by fifteen percent and then the difference added to the amount determined in paragraph 1.

For the 2022-23 school year and each school year thereafter, the superintendent shall calculate state aid as the greater of:

The district's weighted student units multiplied by ten thousand two hundred thirty-seven dollars;

The district's baseline funding as established in subsection 1 less the amount in paragraph 1, with the difference reduced by thirty percent for the 2022-23 school year and the reduction percentage increasing by fifteen percent each school year thereafter until the difference is reduced to zero, and then the difference added to the amount determined in paragraph 1.

The superintendent also shall adjust state aid determined in this subsection to ensure the amount does not exceed the transition maximum as follows:

For the 2021-22 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, multiplied by the district's weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2022-23 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, multiplied by the district's weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2023-24 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, plus twenty percent of the difference between the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection and one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit. The transition maximum is determined by multiplying the transition maximum rate, which may not exceed the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection, by the district's weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2024-25 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, plus forty percent of the difference between the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection and one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit. The transition maximum is determined by multiplying the transition maximum rate, which may not exceed the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection, by the district's weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2025-26 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, plus sixty percent of the difference between the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection and one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit. The transition maximum is determined by multiplying the transition maximum rate, which may not exceed the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection, by the district's weighted student units from the previous school year.

For the 2026-27 school year, the transition maximum rate is one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, plus eighty percent of the difference between the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection and one hundred ten percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit. The transition maximum is determined by multiplying the transition maximum rate, which may not exceed the rate under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of this subsection, by the district's weighted student units from the previous school year

After determining the product in accordance with subsection 3, the superintendent of public instruction shall:

Subtract an amount equal to sixty mills multiplied by the taxable valuation of the school district; and

Subtract an amount equal to seventy-five percent of all revenue types listed in subdivisions c and d of subsection 1. Before determining the deduction for seventy-five percent of all revenue types, the superintendent of public instruction shall adjust revenues as follows:

Tuition revenue shall be adjusted as follows:

IIn addition to deducting tuition revenue received specifically for the operation of an educational program provided at a residential treatment facility, tuition revenue received for the provision of an adult farm management program, and tuition received under an agreement to educate students from a school district on an air force base with funding received through federal impact aid as directed each school year in paragraph 3 of subdivision c of subsection 1, the superintendent of public instruction also shall reduce the total tuition reported by the school district by the amount of tuition revenue received for the education of students not residing in the state and for which the state has not entered a cross-border education contract; and

The superintendent of public instruction also shall reduce the total tuition reported by admitting school districts meeting the requirements of subdivision e of subsection 2 of section 15.1-29-12 by the amount of tuition revenue received for the education of students residing in an adjacent school district.

After adjusting tuition revenue as provided in paragraph 1, the superintendent shall reduce all remaining revenues from all revenue types by the percentage of mills levied in 2020 by the school district for sinking and interest relative to the total mills levied in 2020 by the school district for all purposes.

The amount remaining after the computation required under subsection 4 is the amount of state aid to which a school district is entitled, subject to any other statutory requirements or limitations.

On or before June thirtieth of each year, the school board shall certify to the superintendent of public instruction the final average daily membership for the current school year

For purposes of the calculation in subsection 4, each county auditor, in collaboration with the school districts, shall report the following to the superintendent of public instruction on an annual basis:

The amount of revenue received by each school district in the county during the previous school year for each type of revenue identified in subdivisions c and d of subsection 1;

The total number of mills levied in the previous calendar year by each school district for all purposes; and

The number of mills levied in the previous calendar year by each school district for sinking and interest fund purposes.

One hundred two percent of the district's baseline funding per weighted student unit, as established in subsection 2, multiplied by the district's weighted student units, not to exceed the district's 2017-18 baseline weighted student units, plus any weighted student units in excess of the 2017-18 baseline weighted student units multiplied by ten thousand two hundred thirty-seven dollars; or

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 13, § 34; 2015, ch. 137, § 11, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 135, § 4, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 149, § 10, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 141, § 11, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 161, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 161, § 11, effective July 1, 2025.

15.1-27-04.2.
State aid — Minimum local effort — Determination.

If a district’s taxable valuation per student is less than twenty percent of the state average valuation per student, the superintendent of public instruction, for purposes of determining state aid in accordance with section 15.1-27-04.1, shall utilize an amount equal to sixty mills times twenty percent of the state average valuation per student multiplied by the number of weighted student units in the district.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 13, § 35; 2015, ch. 137, § 12, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 12 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by
section 12, of chapter 137, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.

15.1-27-04.3.
Adjustment to state aid — Local property tax effort.
[Expired effective July 1, 2025]

If the amount subtracted from a school district’s state aid payment under subdivision a of subsection 4 of section 15.1-27-04.1 is less than the amount generated by sixty mills, the superintendent of public instruction shall adjust the amount subtracted as follows:

For the 2020-21 school year, increase the amount subtracted by an amount equal to ten percent of the difference between the amount generated by sixty mills and the amount determined pursuant to subdivision a of subsection 4 of section 15.1-27-04.1 before adjustment under this section;

For the 2021-22 school year, increase the amount subtracted by an amount equal to twenty percent of the difference between the amount generated by sixty mills and the amount determined pursuant to subdivision a of subsection 4 of section 15.1-27-04.1 before adjustment under this section;

For the 2022-23 school year, increase the amount subtracted by an amount equal to forty percent of the difference between the amount generated by sixty mills and the amount determined pursuant to subdivision a of subsection 4 of section 15.1-27-04.1 before adjustment under this section;

For the 2023-24 school year, increase the amount subtracted by an amount equal to sixty percent of the difference between the amount generated by sixty mills and the amount determined pursuant to subdivision a of subsection 4 of section 15.1-27-04.1 before adjustment under this section; and

For the 2024-25 school year, increase the amount subtracted by an amount equal to eighty percent of the difference between the amount generated by sixty mills and the amount determined pursuant to subdivision a of subsection 4 of section 15.1-27-04.1 before adjustment under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 149, § 12, effective August 1, 2019.

15.1-27-04.3.
Adjustment to state aid — Local property tax effort.
[Expired effective July 1, 2025]

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 149, § 12, effective August 1, 2019; expired pursuant to 2019, ch. 149, § 27, effective July 1, 2025.

15.1-27-05.
School district equalization factor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-06.
Per student payments — Weighting factors — High school students. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-07.
Per student payments — Weighting factors — Elementary school students. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-07.1.
Kindergarten payments — Determination. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 13, § 64.

15.1-27-07.2.
Baseline funding — Determination — Minimum and maximum allowable increases. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 10; 2009, ch. 175, § 33; 2011, ch. 147, § 25; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38., effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-27-08.
Per student payments — Unaccredited high schools. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 131, § 9.

15.1-27-09.
Per student payments — Unaccredited elementary schools. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 131, § 9.

15.1-27-10.
Per student payments — Special education.

Upon the written request of a school district, the superintendent of public instruction may forward all or a portion of any per student special education payments to which a school district is entitled directly to the special education unit of which the school district is a member.

The superintendent of public instruction may withhold state special education funds due a school district if, in response to a complaint, the superintendent finds that the district is not providing a free appropriate public education to a student as required by law. Any withholding under this subsection may not exceed an amount equal to the cost of meeting the affected student’s needs.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2003 Sp., ch. 667, § 13; 2007, ch. 163, § 13.

15.1-27-11.
Equity payments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2003 Sp., ch. 667, § 14; S.L. 2005, ch. 167, § 15; 2005, ch. 169, § 1; 2007, ch. 163, § 14; 2009, ch. 175, § 34; 2011, ch. 147, § 26; 2013, ch. 13, § 62; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38., effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-27-12.
Per student payments — English language learners. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-13.
Per student payments — Students on active duty.

A school district is entitled to receive payments under this chapter for a student who is absent up to one semester because the student is a member of the North Dakota national guard and is engaged in active duty or training within or outside the state.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11.

15.1-27-14.
Per student payments — Students attending school out of state. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-15.
Isolated schools. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 44.

15.1-27-15.1.
Isolated school districts — Transition payments.

If during the 2010-11 school year, a school district received payments as a result of section 15.1-27-15, as the section existed on June 30, 2011, and if that district is not eligible for the factor established under subdivision h of subsection 1 of section 15.1-27-03.1, the district is entitled to the following transition payments:

For the 2013-14 school year, an amount equal to that which the district would have received under section 15.1-27-15, as the section existed on June 30, 2011;

For the 2014-15 school year, an amount equal to seventy-five percent of that which the district would have received under section 15.1-27-15, as the section existed on June 30, 2011;

For the 2015-16 school year, an amount equal to fifty percent of that which the district would have received under section 15.1-27-15, as the section existed on June 30, 2011; and

For the 2016-17 school year, an amount equal to twenty-five percent of that which the district would have received under section 15.1-27-15, as the section existed on June 30, 2011.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 161, § 1.

Note.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction from the state since the 2015 cumulative supplement. In the first sentence, the reference to subdivision (j) was changed to (h).

15.1-27-16.
Per student payments — Administrative cost-sharing — Cooperating districts and special education units. [Effective through June 30, 2024]

If any school district receiving payments under this chapter cooperates with another school district for the joint provision of educational services under a plan approved by the superintendent of public instruction, the superintendent of public instruction shall, notwithstanding the provisions of section 15.1-27-03.2, create and assign a separate weighting factor that allows the cooperating districts to receive, for a period of four years, a payment rate equivalent to that which each district would have received had the cooperative plan not taken effect. The superintendent of public instruction shall compute the separate weighting factor to four decimal places and that weighting factor is effective for the duration of the cooperative plan.

A school district that is cooperating with another school district under a cooperative plan approved by the superintendent of public instruction, and which has taxable property located in the same city as the other school district under the cooperative plan, may not be required as part of the cooperative plan to:

Provide unduplicated grade level services; or

Share administrative personnel.

If any school district receiving payments under this chapter or any special education unit cooperates with another school district or special education unit to jointly employ both a superintendent and a business manager or to jointly employ both a special education unit director and a business manager, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide partial reimbursement of the combined salaries of the superintendent and the business manager or partial reimbursement of the combined salaries of the special education unit director and the business manager as follows:

If the combined salaries exceed three hundred thousand dollars, the amount of the reimbursement must be calculated based upon three hundred thousand dollars. Each cooperating school district or special education unit shall receive a prorated share of the reimbursement percentages listed below based on the percentage of full-time equivalency that the superintendent and business manager or the special education unit director and business manager are employed by each district or special education unit. The percentage of reimbursement for the combined salaries of the jointly hired superintendent and business manager or of the jointly hired special education unit director and business manager must be as follows:

If two schools or special education units are cooperating, ten percent of the combined salaries;

If three schools or special education units are cooperating, fifteen percent of the combined salaries;

If four schools or special education units are cooperating, twenty percent of the combined salaries; and

If five or more schools or special education units are cooperating, twenty-five percent of the combined salaries.

To be eligible for reimbursement under this subsection, the cooperating school districts or special education units must:

Have been approved by the superintendent of public instruction and have implemented their administrative cost-sharing program after June 30, 2022; and

Submit the salaries of the superintendent and business manager or the salaries of the special education unit director and business manager to the superintendent of public instruction by June first of each year.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2007, ch. 163, § 16; 2019, ch. 169, § 1, effective April 11, 2019; 2021, ch. 13, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

15.1-27-16.
Per student payments — Cooperating districts. [Effective July 1, 2024]

If any school district receiving payments under this chapter cooperates with another school district for the joint provision of educational services under a plan approved by the superintendent of public instruction, the superintendent of public instruction shall, notwithstanding the provisions of section 15.1-27-03.2, create and assign a separate weighting factor that allows the cooperating districts to receive, for a period of four years, a payment rate equivalent to that which each district would have received had the cooperative plan not taken effect. The superintendent of public instruction shall compute the separate weighting factor to four decimal places and that weighting factor is effective for the duration of the cooperative plan.

A school district that is cooperating with another school district under a cooperative plan approved by the superintendent of public instruction, and which has taxable property located in the same city as the other school district under the cooperative plan, may not be required as part of the cooperative plan to:

Provide unduplicated grade level services; or

Share administrative personnel.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2007, ch. 163, § 16; 2019, ch. 169, § 1, effective April 11, 2019; 2021, ch. 13, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

15.1-27-17.
Per student payments — Reorganization of school districts — Separate weighting factor.

Notwithstanding section 15.1-27-03.2, the superintendent of public instruction shall create and assign a separate weighting factor to any school district that reorganizes on or after July 1, 2007.

The separate weighting factor must allow the reorganized school district to receive a payment rate equivalent to that which each separate school district would have received had the reorganization not taken place.

The separate weighting factor must be computed to four decimal places.

The provisions of this subsection are effective for a period of four years from the date of the reorganization.

At the beginning of the fifth and at the beginning of the sixth years after the date of the reorganization, the superintendent of public instruction shall make proportionate adjustments in the assigned weighting factor so that beginning with the seventh year after the date of the reorganization, the weighting factor that will be applied to the reorganized district is that provided in section 15.1-27-03.2.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2007, ch. 163, § 17; 2013, ch. 13, § 36.

15.1-27-18.
Per student payments — Eligibility.

In order to be counted for the purpose of calculating per student payments, as provided for by this chapter, a high school student must be enrolled in at least four high school units. The units may include career and technical education courses offered in accordance with chapter 15-20.1 and courses that are approved by the superintendent of public instruction and offered by another high school district.

If a student is enrolled for graduation in a nonpublic school or if a student is taking fewer than four high school units and is enrolled in an approved alternative high school education program, the school district in which the student is enrolled is entitled to receive proportionate payments.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2003, ch. 138, § 67; 2007, ch. 163, § 18.

15.1-27-19.
Summer school courses and programs — Payments to school districts.

Before a weight may be assigned under section 15.1-27-03.1 for a student enrolled in a high school summer course, the superintendent of public instruction shall verify that the course meets the requirements of section 15.1-21-16.

Before a weight may be assigned under section 15.1-27-03.1 for a student enrolled in an elementary summer program, the superintendent of public instruction shall verify that the program meets the requirements of section 15.1-21-16 and complies with rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2003 Sp., ch. 667, § 15; 2007, ch. 163, § 19; 2009, ch. 175, § 37.

15.1-27-20.
State aid payments — Claim by school district — Appeal.

Any school district claiming state aid payments under this chapter shall provide to the superintendent of public instruction, at the time and in the manner requested by the superintendent, all information necessary for the processing of the claim.

If the superintendent of public instruction denies a district’s claim for state aid payments, in whole or in part, the district may appeal the determination of the superintendent by filing a written notice with the superintendent, within thirty days from the date on which the district received the original determination. The superintendent of public instruction may modify the original determination if the evidence submitted by the district justifies a modification. Upon appeal, or if a timely appeal is not made, the determination of the superintendent is final.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2003, ch. 150, § 3; 2007, ch. 163, § 20.

15.1-27-20.1.
General fund levy — Impact on state aid. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 535, § 8 and ch. 175, §
64.

15.1-27-20.2.
Taxable valuation — Impact on state aid.

If a school district’s imputed taxable valuation per student is greater than one hundred fifty percent of the state average imputed taxable valuation per student, the superintendent of public instruction shall:

Determine the difference between the district’s imputed taxable valuation per student and one hundred fifty percent of the state average imputed taxable valuation per student;

Multiply the dollar amount determined under subdivision a by the district’s average daily membership;

Multiply the dollar amount determined under subdivision b by one hundred eighty-five mills;

Multiply the dollar amount determined under subdivision c by a factor of 0.75; and

Subtract the dollar amount determined under subdivision d from the total amount of state aid to which the district is otherwise entitled.

For purposes of this section, “imputed taxable valuation” means the valuation of all taxable real property in the district plus an amount determined by dividing the district’s mineral and tuition revenue by sixty percent of the district’s general fund mill levy. Beginning July 1, 2008, “imputed taxable valuation” means the valuation of all taxable real property in the district plus an amount determined by dividing seventy percent of the district’s mineral and tuition revenue by the district’s general fund mill levy.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 22.

15.1-27-21.
Payment to school district — Property valuation changes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-22.
Insufficient moneys — Fractional payments.

If moneys in the state general fund are insufficient to make all payments to school districts, the superintendent of public instruction shall prorate the payments on a fractional basis. As additional moneys come into the fund, payments may be made until the school districts receive all moneys to which they are entitled. If an appropriation made by the legislative assembly is inadequate to meet all claims against the appropriation and is therefore the cause of the insufficiency, the prorated fractional payments made under this section constitute payment in full.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11.

15.1-27-22.1.
Distribution of remaining moneys. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 29; 2013, ch. 13, § 62; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38., effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-27-23.
Weather or other conditions — Closure of schools — State aid payments to school districts.

The board of each school district shall establish the length of a period, day, and week in accordance with the requirements of section 15.1-06-04. If a public school or school district is closed or provides less than a full day of instruction, the public school or school district shall reschedule those hours to ensure students receive at least the minimum number of instructional hours required by subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 15.1-06-04. A school or school district may satisfy the requirements of this section by providing virtual instruction under section 15.1-06-04.

Any public school or school district for which the rescheduling of classes would create undue hardship may request that, for purposes of calculating state aid payments to the school district, the governor waive the rescheduling in whole or in part.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2011, ch. 147, § 27; 2011, ch. 148, § 1; 2015, ch. 137, § 13, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 149, § 13, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 140, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-27-24.
Taylor Grazing Act funds — Disposition.

The state treasurer shall apportion payments from the federal government to this state under the provisions of 43 United States Code 315i (the Taylor Grazing Act) among the counties in the state in the proportion that the number of acres [hectares] of Taylor Grazing Act land in each county bears to the total amount of Taylor Grazing Act land in the state. The state treasurer shall provide the payment to the county treasurer of each county receiving payments as directed by the United States bureau of land management. Each county treasurer receiving payments shall distribute the funds to school districts in that county on the basis of average daily membership of all students residing within the county.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2005, ch. 170, § 1; 2013, ch. 162, § 1.

Collateral References.

Construction and Application of Taylor Grazing Act (43 U.S.C.S. §§ 315 et seq.) and Regulations Promulgated Thereunder,. 71 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 197.

15.1-27-25.
Royalties available under federal law — Distribution to counties and school districts — Continuing appropriation.

Any money paid to the state by the secretary of the treasury of the United States under the provisions of an Act of Congress entitled “An Act to promote the mining of coal, phosphate, oil, oil shale, gas, and sodium on the public domain” [Pub. L. 66-146; 41 Stat. 437; 30 U.S.C. 181 et seq.] must be credited to the state general fund and the federal mineral royalties distribution fund and must be distributed only pursuant to the terms of this section.

Within three months following the calendar quarters ending in March, June, September, and December, the state auditor shall certify to the state treasurer the amount of money the state received during the preceding calendar quarter for royalties under the Act of Congress cited in subsection 1.

The state treasurer shall allocate the percentage of the total moneys received as required by this section among the counties in which the minerals were produced based on the proportion each county’s mineral royalty revenue bears to the total mineral royalty revenue received by the state for that calendar quarter. The state treasurer shall pay the amount calculated to each county.

The counties may use any money received under this section only for the planning, construction, and maintenance of public facilities and the provision of public services. As used in this section, public facilities include any facility used primarily for public use as determined by the board of county commissioners whether located on public or private property.

The percentage of money received by the state under the Act of Congress cited in subsection 1 which must be allocated and paid to the counties under this section is fifty percent.

Any remaining money received by the state under the Act of Congress cited in subsection 1 must be distributed to school districts as provided for in this chapter. Any moneys distributed under this subsection are deemed the first moneys withdrawn or expended from the general fund for the purpose of state aid to school districts.

A reserve for distributions to counties pursuant to this section is created as a special fund in the state treasury known as the federal mineral royalties distribution fund. The state treasurer shall deposit in the fund fifty percent of amounts received pursuant to this section.

The funds needed to make the distribution to counties, as provided for in this section, are hereby appropriated on a continuing basis.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2005, ch. 171, § 1; 2013, ch. 15, § 20.

15.1-27-26.
School district transportation of students — Payments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, Sp., ch. 667, § 41.

15.1-27-26.1.
School district transportation of students — Payments.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the superintendent of public instruction shall pay each school district providing schoolbus transportation in contract schoolbuses or in district-owned and operated schoolbuses, and each school district with students riding commercial buses to and from school within the incorporated limits of a city, the following amounts from state funds:

For schoolbuses and school vehicles transporting students:

Fifty-two cents per mile [1.61 kilometers] for vehicles that have a capacity of fewer than ten students; and

One dollar and eleven cents per mile [1.61 kilometers] for schoolbuses that have a capacity of ten or more students; and

Thirty cents per one-way trip for each student transported.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide per mileage payments if:

A school district qualifies to receive payment pursuant to subsection 1; and

The school district operates schoolbuses in accordance with state law relating to schoolbus standards and school vehicle driver requirements. A school district shall certify compliance with state law relating to schoolbus standards and school vehicle driver requirements when applying for payment under this section. The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules governing certification of compliance under this subdivision.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the superintendent of public instruction shall reimburse school districts fifty cents per day per mile [1.61 kilometers] one-way for each mile over two miles [3.22 kilometers] for students transported by family transportation in accordance with section 15.1-30-02, according to the distance between the home of the student and the school. The distance must be measured by the route from the front door of the school attended to the front door of the residence of the family of the student according to the most convenient public course traveled.

The superintendent of public instruction shall use the latest available student enrollment count in each school district in applying the provisions of this section, with the exception of the 2021-22 and 2022-23 school years, for which the superintendent of public instruction shall calculate each school district’s payment based on the district’s miles and ridership data from the 2018-19 school year or the previous school year, whichever is greater.

This section does not authorize the reimbursement of any costs incurred in providing transportation for students to attend extracurricular activities or events.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 162, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-27-27.
School district transportation of special education students — Payments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, Sp., ch. 667, § 41.